Ohio, session 136, HB651.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO: Section 1. That section 5534.619 of the Revised Code be enacted to read as follows: Sec. 5534.619. The bridge spanning the Scioto river, located in Ross county and being part of the highway known as state route number two hundred seven, shall be known as the "Sgt. Andrew Lansing Memorial Bridge." The director of transportation may erect suitable markers upon the bridge or its approaches indicating its name.